Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.092

Stormwater control facilities—Alternative interest rate on delinquent charges.

Any county may provide, by resolution or ordinance, that delinquent stormwater service charges bear interest at a rate of twelve percent per annum, computed on a monthly basis, in lieu of the interest rate provided for in RCW 35.67.200.

[ 1987 c 241 s 2.]